California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(g) This section shall not apply to individuals subject to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 11331) during the time that article is operative.

(h) This section shall become inoperative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11325.21, as added by the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 52.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Inoperative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.21.

(a) Any individual who is required to participate in welfare-to-work activities pursuant to this article shall enter into a written welfare-to-work plan with the county welfare department after assessment, as required by subdivision (c) of Section 11320.1, but no more than 90 days after the date that a recipient’s eligibility for aid is determined or the date the recipient is required to participate in welfare-to-work activities pursuant to Section 11320.3. The recipient and the county may enter into a welfare-to-work plan as late as 90 days after the completion of the job search activity, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 11320.1, if the job search activity is initiated within 30 days after the recipient’s eligibility for aid is determined. The plan shall include the activities and services that
 will move the individual into employment.

(b) The county shall allow the participant three working days after completion of the plan or subsequent amendments to the plan in which to evaluate and request changes to the terms of the plan.

(c) The plan shall be written in clear and understandable language, and have a simple and easy-to-read format.

(d) The plan shall contain at least all of the following general information:

(1) A general description of the program provided for in this article, including available program components and supportive services.

(2) A general description of the rights, duties, and responsibilities of program participants, including a list of the exemptions from
 the required participation under this article, the consequences of a refusal to participate in program components, and criteria for successful completion of the program.

(3) A description of the grace period required in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 11325.22.

(e) (1) The plan shall specify, and shall be amended to reflect changes in, the participant’s welfare-to-work activity, a description of services to be provided in accordance with Sections 11322.6 and 11322.8, as needed, and specific requirements for successful completion of assigned activities, including required hours of participation.

(2) The plan shall also include a general description of supportive services pursuant to Section 11323.2 that are to be provided as necessary for the participant to complete assigned program
 activities.

(f) Any assignment to a program component shall be reflected in the plan or an amendment to the plan. The participant shall maintain satisfactory progress toward employment through the methods set forth in the plan, and the county shall provide the services pursuant to Section 11323.2.

(g) This section shall not apply to individuals subject to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 11331) during the time that article is operative.

(h) This section shall become operative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 53.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Operative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.22.

(a) (1) Following the appraisal required by Section 11325.2, all participants except those described in paragraph (4) of this subdivision or those who are participating in other activities or assessment pursuant to Section 11320.1, shall be assigned to participate for a period of up to four consecutive weeks in job search activities. These activities may include the use of job clubs to identify the participant’s qualifications. The county shall consider the skills and interests of the participants in developing a job search strategy. The period of job search activities may be shortened if the participant and the county agree that further activities would not be beneficial. Job search activities may be shortened for a recipient if the county determines that the recipient will not benefit because
 they may suffer from an emotional or mental disability that will limit or preclude the recipient’s participation under this article.

(2) Nothing in this section shall require participation in job search activities, the schedule for which interferes with unsubsidized employment or participation pursuant to Section 11325.23.

(3) Job search activities may be required in excess of the limits specified in paragraph (1) on the basis of a review by the county of the recipient’s performance during job search to determine whether extending the job search period would result in unsubsidized employment.

(4) A person subject to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 11331) or subdivision (d) of Section 11320.3 shall not be required, but may be permitted, to participate in job search
 activities as
 their first program assignment following appraisal upon earning a high school diploma or its equivalent, if they have not already taken the option to complete these activities as the first program assignment following appraisal.

(b) (1) Upon the completion of job search activities, or a determination that those activities are not required, the participant shall be assigned to one or more of the activities described in Section 11322.6 as needed to attain employment.

(2) (A) The assignment to one or more of the program activities as required in paragraph (1) of this subdivision shall be based on
 the welfare-to-work plan developed pursuant to an assessment as described in Section 11325.4. The plan shall be based, at a minimum, on consideration of the individual’s existing education level, employment experience and relevant employment skills, available program resources, and local labor market opportunities.

(B) An assessment pursuant to Section 11325.4 shall be performed upon completion of job search activities or at such time as it is determined that job search will not be beneficial.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B), an assessment shall not be required to develop a welfare-to-work plan for a person who is participating in an approved self-initiated program pursuant to Section 11325.23 unless the county determines that an assessment is necessary to meet the hours specified in Section 11325.23.

(3) A participant who lacks basic literacy or mathematics skills, a high school diploma or general educational development certificate, or English language skills, shall be assigned to participate in adult basic education as described in subdivision (k) of Section 11322.6, as appropriate and necessary for removal of the individual’s barriers to employment.

(4) Participation in activities assigned pursuant to this section may be sequential or concurrent. The county may require concurrent participation in the assigned activities if it is appropriate to the participant’s abilities, consistent with the participant’s welfare-to-work plan, and the activities can be concurrently scheduled.

(5) The participant has 30 days from the beginning of the initial training or education assignment in which to request a change or reassignment to another component. The county shall grant
 the participant’s request for reassignment if another assignment is available that is consistent with the participant’s welfare-to-work plan and the county determines the other assignment will readily lead to employment. This grace period shall be available only once to each participant.

(c) Any assignment or change in assignment to a program activity pursuant to this section shall be included in the welfare-to-work plan, or an amendment to the plan, as required in Section 11325.21.

(d) A participant who has not obtained unsubsidized employment upon completion of the activities in a welfare-to-work plan developed pursuant to the job search activities required by subdivision (a) and an assessment required by subdivision (b) shall be referred to reappraisal as described in Section 11326.

(e) The criteria for successful
 completion of an assigned education or training activity shall include regular attendance, satisfactory progress, and completion of the assignment. A person who fails or refuses to comply with program requirements for participation in the activities assigned pursuant to this section shall be subject to Sections 11327.4 and 11327.5.

(f) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), this section shall not apply to individuals subject to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 11331) during the time that article is operative.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, or, if automation is necessary, the later of July 1, 2026, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, as added by the act that added this subdivision, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 15.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative on or after July 1, 2026, as prescribed by its own provisions.     Conditionally repealed January 1 following the inoperative date.   See later operative version added by Sec. 16 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.22.

(a) Participation in activities assigned pursuant to this section may be sequential or concurrent. The county may require concurrent participation in the assigned activities if it is appropriate to the participant’s abilities, consistent with the participant’s welfare-to-work plan, and the activities can be concurrently scheduled.

(b) The participant has 30 days from the beginning of the initial training or education assignment in which to request a change or reassignment to another component. The county shall grant the participant’s request for reassignment if another assignment is available that is consistent with the participant’s welfare-to-work plan and the county determines the other assignment will readily lead to employment. This
 grace period shall be available only once to each participant.

(c) Any assignment or change in assignment to a program activity pursuant to this section shall be included in the welfare-to-work plan, or an amendment to the plan, as required in Section 11325.21.

(d) This section shall not apply to individuals subject to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 11331) during the time that article is operative.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, or, if automation is necessary, the later of July 1, 2026, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 15) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 16.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.23.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), any student who does not meet the requirements of Section 11322.84 at the time the student is required to participate under this article pursuant to Section 11320.3, and who is enrolled in any undergraduate degree or certificate program that leads to employment may continue in that program if the student is making satisfactory progress in that program, the county determines that continuing in the program is likely to lead to self-supporting employment for that recipient, and the welfare-to-work plan reflects that determination.

(2) Any individual who possesses a baccalaureate degree shall not be eligible to
 participate under this section unless the individual is pursuing a California regular classroom teaching credential in a college or university with an approved teacher credential preparation program.

(3) (A) Subject to the limitation provided in subdivision (f), a program shall be determined to lead to employment if it is on a list of programs that the county welfare department and local education agencies or providers agree lead to employment. The list shall be agreed to annually, with the first list completed no later than January 31, 1998. By January 1, 2000, all educational providers shall report data regarding programs on the list for the purposes of the report card established under former Section 15037.1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code for the programs to remain on the list.

(B) For students not in a program on the list prepared under subparagraph (A), the county shall determine if the program leads to employment. The recipient shall be allowed to continue in the program if the recipient demonstrates to the county that the program will lead to self-supporting employment for that recipient and the documentation is included in the welfare-to-work plan.

(C) If participation in educational or vocational training, as determined by the number of hours required for classroom, laboratory, study time provided for by an educational or training institution, or internship activities, is not at least 30 hours, or if subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11322.8 applies, 20 hours, the county shall require concurrent participation in work
 activities pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (j), inclusive, of Section 11322.6 and Section 11325.22.

(b) Participation in the self-initiated education or vocational training program shall be reflected in the welfare-to-work plan required by Section 11325.21. The welfare-to-work plan shall provide that whenever an individual ceases to participate in, refuses to attend regularly, or does not maintain satisfactory progress in the self-initiated program, the individual shall participate under this article in accordance with Section 11325.22.

(c) Any person whose previously approved self-initiated education or training program is interrupted for reasons that meet the good cause criteria specified in subdivision (f) of Section 11320.3 may resume participation in the same program if the participant
 maintained good standing in the program while participating and the self-initiated program continues to meet the approval criteria.

(d) Supportive services reimbursement shall be provided for any participant in a self-initiated training or education program approved under this subdivision. This reimbursement shall be provided if no other source of funding for those costs is available. Any offset to supportive services payments shall be made in accordance with subdivision (e) of Section 11323.4.

(e) Any student who, at the time the student is required to participate under this article pursuant to Section 11320.3, has been enrolled and is making satisfactory progress in a degree or certificate program, but does not meet the criteria set forth in subdivision (a), shall have until
 the beginning of the next educational semester or quarter break to continue the student’s educational program if the student continues to make satisfactory progress. At the time the educational break occurs, the individual is required to participate pursuant to Section 11320.1. A recipient not expected to complete the program by the next break may continue the student’s education, provided the student transfers at the end of the current quarter or semester to a program that qualifies under that subdivision, the county determines that participation is likely to lead to self-supporting employment of the recipient, and the welfare-to-work plan reflects that determination.

(f) Any degree, certificate, or vocational program offered by a private postsecondary training provider shall not be approved under this section unless the program is either
 approved or exempted by the appropriate state regulatory agency and the program is in compliance with all other provisions of law.

(g) This section shall not apply to a CalWORKs eligible individual who is participating in an educational activity full time or part time at a publicly funded or nonprofit postsecondary educational institution in accordance with Section 11322.84 and receiving payments pursuant to Section 11323.21.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 447, Sec. 3.   (SB 768)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.24.

(a) If, in the course of appraisal pursuant to Section 11325.2 or at any point during an individual’s participation in welfare-to-work activities in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11322.85, it is determined that a recipient meets the criteria described in subdivision (b), the recipient is eligible to participate in family stabilization.

(b) (1) A recipient is eligible to participate in family stabilization if the county determines that the recipient’s family is experiencing an identified situation or crisis that is destabilizing the family and would interfere with participation in welfare-to-work activities and services.

(2) A situation or a crisis that is destabilizing the family in accordance with paragraph (1) may include, but shall not be limited to:

(A) Homelessness or imminent risk of homelessness.

(B) A lack of safety due to domestic violence.

(C) Untreated or undertreated behavioral needs, including mental health or substance abuse-related needs.

(c) Family stabilization shall include intensive case management and services designed to support the family in overcoming the situation or crisis, which may include, but are not limited to, welfare-to-work activities.

(d) Funds allocated for family stabilization in accordance with this section shall be in addition to, and independent of, the county allocations made pursuant to Section 15204.2.

(e) Funds allocated for family stabilization in accordance with this section, or the county allocations made pursuant to Section 15204.2, may be used to provide housing and other needed services to a family during any month that a family is participating in family stabilization.

(f) Each county shall submit to the department a plan, as defined by the department, regarding how it intends to implement the provisions
 of this section and shall report information to the department, including, but not limited to, the number of recipients served pursuant to this section, information regarding the services provided, outcomes for the families served, and any lack of availability of services. The department shall provide an update regarding this information to the Legislature during the 2014–15 budget process.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that family stabilization be a voluntary component intended to provide needed services and constructive interventions for parents and to assist in barrier removal for families facing very difficult needs. Participants in family stabilization are encouraged to participate, but the Legislature does not intend that parents be sanctioned as part of their experience in this program component. The Legislature further intends that recipients refusing or unable to follow their family stabilization plans without good cause be
 returned to the traditional welfare-to-work program.

(h) This section shall become inoperative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement Section 11325.24, as added by the act that added this subdivision, whichever date is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 54.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Inoperative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.24.

(a) If, in the course of appraisal pursuant to Section 11325.2 or at any point during an individual’s participation in welfare-to-work activities, it is determined that a recipient meets the criteria described in subdivision (b), the recipient is eligible to participate in family stabilization.

(b) (1) A recipient is eligible to participate in family stabilization if the county determines that the recipient’s family is experiencing an identified situation or crisis that is destabilizing the family and would interfere with participation in welfare-to-work activities and services.

(2) A situation or a crisis that is destabilizing the family in accordance with
 paragraph (1) may include, but shall not be limited to:

(A) Homelessness or imminent risk of homelessness.

(B) A lack of safety due to domestic violence.

(C) Untreated or undertreated behavioral needs, including mental health or substance abuse-related needs.

(c) Family stabilization shall include intensive case management and services designed to support the family in overcoming the situation or crisis, which may include, but are not limited to, welfare-to-work activities.

(d) Funds allocated for family stabilization in accordance with this section shall be in addition to, and independent of, the county allocations made pursuant to Section 15204.2.

(e) Funds allocated for family stabilization in accordance with this section, or the county allocations made pursuant to Section 15204.2, may be used to provide housing and other needed services to a family during any month that a family is participating in family stabilization.

(f) Each county shall submit to the department a plan, as defined by the department, regarding how it intends to implement the provisions of this section and shall report information to the department, including, but not limited to, the number of recipients served pursuant to this section, information regarding the services provided, outcomes for the families served, and any lack of availability of services. The department shall provide an update regarding this information to the Legislature during the 2014–15 budget process.

(g) It is the
 intent of the Legislature that family stabilization be a voluntary component intended to provide needed services and constructive interventions for parents and to assist in barrier removal for families facing very difficult needs. Participants in family stabilization are encouraged to participate, but the Legislature does not intend that parents be sanctioned as part of their experience in this program component. The Legislature further intends that recipients refusing or unable to follow their family stabilization plans without good cause be returned to the traditional welfare-to-work program.

(h) This section shall become operative on May 1, 2022, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 55.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Operative on or after May 1, 2022, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.25.

(a) A participant with a suspected learning or medical problem, as indicated by information received during appraisal or assessment or by lack of satisfactory progress in an assigned program component, shall be referred to an evaluation to determine whether the individual is unable to successfully complete or benefit from a current or proposed program assignment. As part of the evaluation, the county may require the individual to undergo the appropriate examinations to obtain information regarding the individual’s learning and physical
 abilities.

(b) Based upon the results of the evaluation required by subdivision (a), the county may refer the individual to any of the following components as appropriate:

(1) Referral to any of the activities in Section 11322.6, including referral to the person’s previous activity.

(2) Existing special programs that meet specific needs of the individual.

(3) Job search services, if the county determines the individual has the skills needed to find a job in the local labor market.

(4) Assessment as described in Section 11325.4, or reappraisal as described in Section 11326.

(5) Rehabilitation assessment and subsequent
 training.

(c) The participant shall be involved in the decisions made during the progress evaluation and shall have appeal rights consistent with those accorded to all program participants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 110.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 183 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.3.

(a) After a recipient has received services described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.1 for which the county deemed the recipient eligible, other than job club or job search activities, if it is determined that the recipient has not received his or her high school diploma or its equivalent, the recipient shall be
 eligible to participate in a high school equivalency program in order to complete the High School Equivalency Test, General Education Development Test, Test Assessing Secondary Completion, or any other high school equivalency test recognized by the State Department of Education.

(b) This section does not require a recipient to participate in a high school equivalency program. A recipient may choose to engage in a job club or a job search pursuant to
 paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.1, if he or she declines to participate in a high school equivalency program, in writing, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 11320.1.

(c) Recipients eligible pursuant to this section shall not be required to participate in an assessment pursuant to Section 11325.4 prior to, or as a condition of, participation in a high school equivalency program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 303, Sec. 2.   (AB 1604)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.4.

(a) Upon referral to assessment, a participant shall work with the county welfare department to develop and agree on a welfare-to-work plan on the basis of an assessment of the individual’s skills and needs. The assessment shall include at least all of the following:

(1) The participant’s work history and an inventory of their employment skills, knowledge, and abilities.

(2) The participant’s educational history and present educational competency level.

(3) The participant’s need for supportive services in order to obtain the greatest benefit from the employment and training services offered under this article.

(4) An evaluation of the chances for employment given the current skills of the participant and the local labor market conditions.

(5) Local labor market information.

(6) Physical limitations or mental conditions that limit the participant’s ability for employment or participation in welfare-to-work activities.

(b) The county may contract with outside parties, including local educational agencies and service delivery areas, to provide the assessment.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding the procedures set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10950) of Part 2, if the participant and assessor are unable to reach agreement on the welfare-to-work plan, the matter shall be referred by the county for an independent assessment by an impartial third party. The results of this assessment, which shall be binding upon the county and the participant, shall be used to develop the appropriate plan for the participant.

(2) No third party assessment under this subdivision shall be made by a party having any financial or other interest in the result of the assessment. The party making the assessment shall be selected by the county according to an unbiased procedure.

(d) This section shall not apply to individuals subject to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 11331) during the time that article is operative.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, or, if automation is necessary, the later of July 1, 2026, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, as added by the act that added this subdivision, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 17.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative on or after July 1, 2026, as prescribed by its own provisions.    Conditionally repealed January 1 following the inoperative date.   See later operative version added by Sec. 5 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.4.

(a) An assessment shall be available upon completion of orientation and appraisal pursuant to Section 11320.1. An assessment evaluates the participants’ strengths and skills to assist them in choosing the activities they wish to include in their welfare-to-work plan. At the participant’s option, this assessment may incorporate the appraisal tool used pursuant to Section 11325.15 and shall include at least all of the following:

(1) The participant’s work history and an inventory of their employment skills, knowledge, and abilities.

(2) The participant’s educational history and present educational competency level.

(3) The participant’s need for supportive and barrier removal services in order to obtain the greatest benefit from the employment and training services offered under this article.

(4) An evaluation of the chances for employment given the current skills of the participant and the local labor market conditions.

(5) Local labor market information.

(6) Physical limitations or mental conditions that limit the participant’s ability for employment or participation in welfare-to-work activities.

(b) Counties may contract with outside parties, including
 local educational agencies and service delivery areas to perform all or part of the assessment.

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, or, if automation is necessary, the later of July 1, 2026, or when the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this
 section.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 18) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 107, Sec. 5.   (SB 146)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Conditionally operative on or after July 1, 2026, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.5.

(a) If, pursuant to the appraisal conducted pursuant to Section 11325.2 or assessment conducted pursuant to Section 11325.4, there is a concern that a mental disability exists that will impair the ability of a recipient to obtain employment, he or she shall be referred to the county mental health department.

(b) Subject to appropriations in the Budget Act, the county mental health department shall evaluate the recipient and determine any treatment needs. The evaluation shall include the extent to which the individual is capable of employment at the present time and under what working and treatment conditions the individual is capable of employment. The evaluation shall include prior diagnoses, assessments, or evaluations that the recipient
 provides.

(c) Each county human services agency shall develop individual welfare to work plans for recipients with mental or emotional disorders based on the evaluation conducted by the mental health department. The plan for the recipient shall include appropriate employment accommodations or restrictions, supportive services, and treatment requirements. Any prior diagnosis, evaluation, or assessment provided by the recipient shall be considered in the development of his or her individual welfare-to-work plan.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 22) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 23.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.7.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to create a funding stream and program that assists certain recipients of aid under this chapter to receive necessary mental health services, including case management and treatment, thereby enabling them to make the transition from welfare to work. This funding stream shall be used specifically to serve recipients in need of mental health services, and shall be accounted for and expended by each county in a manner that ensures that recipients in need of mental health services are receiving appropriate services.

(b) The county plan required by Section 10531 shall include a plan for the development of mental health employment assistance services, developed jointly by the county
 human services agency and the county department of mental health. The plan shall have as its goal the treatment of mental or emotional disabilities that may limit or impair the ability of a recipient to make the transition from welfare to work, or that may limit or impair the ability to retain employment over a long-term period. The plan shall be developed in a manner consistent with both the county’s welfare-to-work program and the county’s consolidated mental health Medi-Cal services plan. The county may use community-based providers, as necessary, that have experience in addressing the needs of the CalWORKs population. The county, whenever possible, shall ensure that the services provided qualify for federal reimbursement of the nonstate share of Medi-Cal costs.

(c) Subject to specific expenditure authority, mental health services available under this section shall include all of the following elements:

(1) Assessment for the purpose of identifying the level of the participant’s mental health needs and the appropriate level of treatment and rehabilitation for the participant.

(2) Case management, as appropriate, as determined by the county.

(3) Treatment and rehabilitation services, that shall include counseling, as necessary to overcome mental health barriers to employment and mental health barriers to retaining employment, in coordination with an individual’s welfare-to-work plan.

(4) In cases in which a secondary diagnosis of substance abuse is made in a person referred for mental or emotional disorders, the welfare-to-work plan shall also address the substance abuse treatment needs of the participant.

(5) A process by which the county can identify those with severe mental disabilities that may qualify them for aid under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000).

(d) Any funds appropriated by the Legislature to cover the nonfederal costs of the mental health employment assistance services required by this section shall be allocated consistent with the formula used to distribute each county’s CalWORKs program allocation. Each county shall report annually to the state the number of CalWORKs program recipients who received mental health services and the extent to which the allocation is sufficient to meet the need for these services as determined by the county. The State Department of Health Care Services shall develop a uniform methodology for ensuring that this allocation supplements, and does not supplant, current expenditure levels for mental health services for this population.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted on or before July 1, 2018, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 25) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 26.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.8.

(a) The county plan required by Section 10531 shall include a plan for the provision of substance abuse treatment services. The plan shall describe how the county human services agency and the county alcohol and drug program will collaborate to ensure an effective system is available to provide alcohol and drug services to recipients whose substance abuse creates a barrier to employment. The plan shall be developed in a manner that is consistent with the county’s welfare-to-work program. Substance abuse treatment services shall include evaluation, substance abuse treatment, employment counseling, provision of community service jobs, or other appropriate services.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that substance abuse treatment services
 for participants shall be provided by the county alcohol and drug program, or by a nonprofit agency under contract with the county alcohol and drug program. If the county human services agency determines that the county alcohol and drug program is unable to provide the needed services, the county department may contract directly with a nonprofit state-licensed narcotic treatment program, residential facility, or certified nonresidential substance abuse program to obtain substance abuse services for a participant.

(c) (1) A participant who is in a job search component of the county’s welfare-to-work program may be directed at any time to an assessment by the job search manager if the county believes that the participant’s substance abuse may limit or preclude his or her satisfactory completion of the job search component.

(2) During the assessment, if the case
 manager believes that substance abuse will impair the ability of the participant to obtain and retain employment, the case manager shall refer the participant to the county alcohol and drug program for an evaluation and determination of any treatment necessary for the participant’s transition from welfare to work. If the county alcohol and drug program is unable to provide the necessary services, the county may refer the participant to a state-licensed or certified nonprofit agency under contract with the county to perform these services.

(3) If a participant is determined to have a substance abuse problem, based on an evaluation by the county alcohol and drug program or a nonprofit state-licensed narcotic treatment program, residential facility, or certified nonresidential substance abuse program, the case manager shall develop the participant’s welfare-to-work plan based on the results of that evaluation. In that case, the participant’s
 welfare-to-work plan may include appropriate treatment requirements, including assignment to a substance abuse program.

(4) A recipient of aid under this chapter shall be offered two opportunities to receive substance abuse treatment under subdivision (q) of Section 11322.6, except that the county may offer the recipient additional treatment opportunities.
